Arkansas, session 2025, SB450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-1008. Human fetal growth and development education.
(a) As used in this section, "human fetal growth and development
discussion" means an oral, written, or digital lesson, lecture, or
presentation regarding human biology as it relates to pregnancy and human
development inside the womb.
(b)(1)(A) The Department of Education shall include a human fetal
growth and development discussion in the relevant standards during the
Arkansas Academic Standards revision cycle.
(B) The Department of Education, in consultation with the
*TNL247*
03/13/2025 8:50:49 AM TNL247

SB450
Department of Health, shall determine the appropriate grade levels for
receipt of the human fetal growth and development discussion required under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section.
(2) The human fetal growth and development discussion required
by subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall include:
(A) A high-definition ultrasound that shows the brain,
heart, sex organs, and other vital organs in early fetal development; and
(B) The process of fertilization and every stage of human
development inside the uterus, including a discussion that notes significant
markers in cell growth and organ development for every significant marker of
pregnancy until birth.

























03/13/2025 8:50:49 AM TNL247